Oklahoma, session 2026, SB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.16, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 197.16. A. To compute the minimum wage of any employee
coming within the purview of this act the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act,
credit toward the minimum required wage must shall be given for any
tips or gratuities, meals, or lodging received by the employee up to
but not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of said wage provided that the
employer pays a cash wage of not less than what is required under 29
C.F.R., Section 531.50(a)(1).
B. To compute the minimum wage of any employee coming within
the purview of the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act should the minimum wage
exceed the current federal minimum wage, credit toward the minimum
required wage may be given for any tips or gratuities, meals, or
lodging received by the employee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the Senate the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 250 Page 2